Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202587-1306
Covered online service; parental tools; notification of covered minor.

(1) A covered online service shall provide parents with tools to help parents protect and support minors using covered design features of the covered online service. Such parental tools shall be enabled by default for an individual the covered online service knows to be a child.

(2) With respect to covered design features, a covered online service shall provide parents the ability to do the following for an individual the covered online service knows to be a child or minor, as applicable:

(a) Manage the child's privacy and account settings in a manner that allows parents to:

(i) View the child's account settings; and

(ii) Change and control privacy and account settings of the child;

(b) Restrict purchases and financial transactions of the minor; and

(c) Enable parents to view the total time the child has spent on a covered online service and place reasonable limits on such child's use of the covered online service. Among such protections, a covered online service shall offer parents the ability to restrict a child's use of the covered online service during times of day specified by the parents, including during school hours and at night.

(3) A covered online service shall notify a covered minor of a covered design feature when any of the tools described in this section are in effect and describe what settings have been applied.

Laws 2025, LB504, § 6.